sv: Gängstorlek för upphängning: 2BA; 3/8 tum; M5; M6; Universell snabbkoppling; Övrigt
ko: 행거 스레드 사이즈: 2BA; 3/8인치; M5; M6; 범용 퀵 릴리스; 기타
es: Tamaño de rosca del indicador colgante de pique: 2BA; 3/8 de pulgada; M5; M6; Cierre rápido universal; Otro
fi: Koukkupidikkeen kierrekoko: 2BA; 3/8 tuumaa; M5; M6; Yleismallinen pikalukitus; Muu
hr-HR: Vješalica niz poruka veličina: 2BA; 3/8 inča; M5; M6; Univerzalno brzo otpuštanje; Ostalo
fr: Taille du filetage du support: 2BA; 3/8 po; M5; M6; Attache rapide universelle; Autre
da: Gevindstørrelse til ophæng: 2BA; 3/8 tomme; M5; M6; Universal quick-release; Andet
el: Μέγεθος σπειρώματος ανάρτησης: 2BA; 3/8 ίντσας; M5; M6; Ταχείας απελευθέρωσης γενικής χρήσης; Άλλο
nl: Hanger schroefdraad maat: 2BA; 3/8 inch; M5; M6; Universele quick-release; Overig
nb: Hengertrådstørrelse: 2BA; 3/8 tommer; M5; M6; Universell hurtigkobling; Annet
pt-BR: Tamanho da rosca do hanger: 2BA; 3/8 pol.; M5; M6; Engate rápido universal; Outro
tr: Askı dişli ölçüsü: 2BA; 3/8 inç; M5; M6; Evrensel hızlı açılan; Diğer
cs: Velikost závitu závěsného kolíčku: 2BA; 3/8 palce; M5; M6; Univerzální rychloupínací; Jiný
vi: Kích thước ren móc treo: 2BA; 3/8 inch; M5; M6; Nhả nhanh vạn năng; Khác
zh-CN: 挂钩螺纹规格: 2BA; 3/8 英寸; M5; M6; 通用快拆; 其他
en: Hanger thread size: 2BA; 3/8 inch; M5; M6; Universal quick-release; Other
ro-RO: Dimensiunea filetului umerașului: 2BA; 3/8 inch; M5; M6; Eliberare rapidă universală; Altele
de: Gewindegröße des Aufhängers: 2BA; 3/8 Zoll; M5; M6; Universeller Schnellspanner; Sonstige
pl: Rozmiar gwintu hangera: 2BA; 3/8 cala; M5; M6; Uniwersalny szybkozamykacz; Inne
ja: ハンガーのスレッドサイズ: 2BA; 3/8インチ; M5; M6; ユニバーサルクイックリリース; その他
ru: Размер резьбы держателя: 2BA; 3/8 дюйма; M5; M6; Универсальное быстросъемное; Другое
it: Taglia thread dell'appendiabiti: 2BA; 3/8 di pollice; M5; M6; Sgancio rapido universale; Altro
hu: Kapásjelző menetmérete: 2BA; 3/8 hüvelyk; M5; M6; Univerzális gyorskioldó; Egyéb
zh-TW: 掛架螺紋尺寸: 2BA; 3/8 吋; M5; M6; 通用快拆; 其他
pt-PT: Tamanho thread do cabide: 2BA; 3/8 polegadas; M5; M6; Desengate rápido universal; Outro
bg-BG: Размер на резбата на закачалката: 2BA; 3/8 инча; M5; M6; Универсално бързо освобождаване; Друго
sl-SI: Velikost navoja nosilca: 2BA; 3/8 palca; M5; M6; Univerzalna hitra sprostitev; Drugo
th: ขนาดเกลียวของตัวแขวน: 2BA; 3/8 นิ้ว; M5; M6; ปลดเร็วแบบอเนกประสงค์; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Veľkosť závitu závesu: 2BA; 3/8 palca; M5; M6; Univerzálne rýchloupínacie; Iné
lt-LT: Pakabos sriegio dydis: 2BA; 3/8 colio; M5; M6; Universalus greitojo atlaisvinimo; Kita